en: Music CDs
xx: Music CDs
cs: Hudební CD
da: CD'er
de: Musik-CDs
es: CDs de música
fr: CD audio, CD
it: CD musicali
ja: 音楽CD
nl: Muziek-cd's
no: Musikk-CD-er
pl: Płyty kompaktowe z muzyką
pt: CDs de música
ru: Музыкальные компакт-диски
sv: CD-skivor
tr: Müzik CD'leri

en: Music Cassette Tapes
xx: Music Cassette Tapes
cs: Hudební kazety
da: Kassettebånd
de: Musik-Kassetten
es: Casetes de música
fr: Cassettes audio, Cassette
it: Musicassette
ja: 音楽カセットテープ
nl: Muziekcassettes
no: Musikkassetter
pl: Kasety magnetofonowe z muzyką
pt: Fitas cassete de música
ru: Аудиокассеты
sv: Kassettband
tr: Müzik Kasetleri

en: Records & LPs
xx: Records & LPs
cs: Desky a LP
da: Plader og LP'er
de: Platten & LPs
es: Vinilos y LPs
fr: Disques et vinyles, Disques vinyles, Disque (album)
it: Dischi e LP
ja: レコード・LP
nl: Platen en lp's
no: Plater og LP-er
pl: Płyty i longplaye
pt: Gravações e LPs
ru: Записи и долгоиграющие пластинки
sv: Vinylskivor och LP
tr: Plaklar

en: Spoken Word & Field Recordings
xx: Spoken Word & Field Recordings
cs: Mluvené slovo a terénní nahrávky
da: Spoken word og field recordings
de: Gesprochenes Wort & Field Recordings
es: Palabra hablada y grabaciones de campo
fr: Enregistrements vocaux et de terrain
it: Registratori audio vocali e ambientali
ja: ICレコーダー
nl: Spoken word- en veldopnamen
no: Tale- og feltopptak
pl: Nagrania słowne i terenowe
pt: Gravações em campo e palavras faladas
ru: Записи озвученного текста и полевые записи
sv: Spoken word och fältinspelningar
tr: İnsan ve Ortam Sesi Kayıtları

en: Product Manuals
xx: Product Manuals
cs: Produktové manuály
da: Produktmanualer
de: Produkthandbücher & Gebrauchsanleitungen
es: Manuales de productos
fr: Guides d'utilisation
it: Manuali prodotti
ja: 製品マニュアル
nl: Producthandleidingen
no: Produkthåndbøker
pl: Instrukcje obsługi
pt: Manuais de produtos
ru: Пособия и руководства
sv: Produkthandböcker
tr: Ürün Kullanım Kılavuzları

en: Camera & Optics Manuals
xx: Camera & Optics Manuals
cs: Návody k fotoaparátům a optice
da: Manualer til kameraer og optik
de: Kamera- & Optikhandbücher
es: Manuales de cámaras y ópticas
fr: Manuels pour appareils photo et instruments d'optique
it: Manuali di fotocamere e ottica
ja: カメラ・光学機器マニュアル
nl: Handleidingen voor camera's en optiek
no: Håndbøker for kamera og optikk
pl: Instrukcje obsługi aparatów\, kamer i przyrządów optycznych
pt: Manuais de câmeras e equipamentos ópticos
ru: Руководства для фотоаппаратов и оптических устройств
sv: Bruksanvisningar för kameror och optik
tr: Kamera ve Optik Kullanım Kılavuzları

en: Electronics Manuals
xx: Electronics Manuals
cs: Manuály k elektronickým přístrojům
da: Elektronikmanualer
de: Handbücher für Elektrogeräte
es: Manuales de electrónica
fr: Guides d'utilisation d'articles électroniques
it: Manuali dispositivi elettronici
ja: 電気製品マニュアル
nl: Handleidingen voor elektronica
no: Elektronikk-håndbøker
pl: Instrukcje obsługi elektroniki
pt: Manuais de eletrônicos
ru: Руководства по эксплуатации электроники
sv: Handböcker för elektronik
tr: Elektronik Cihaz Kullanım Kılavuzları

en: Exercise & Fitness Equipment Manuals
xx: Exercise & Fitness Equipment Manuals
cs: Návody ke sportovním potřebám
da: Trænings- og fitnessmanualer
de: Sport- & Freizeithandbücher
es: Manuales de aparatos de ejercicio y fitness
fr: Manuels pour équipements de sport et fitness
it: Manuali di attrezzature sportive e fitness
ja: エクササイズ・フィットネス器具マニュアル
nl: Handleidingen voor sport- en fitnessapparaten
no: Utstyrshåndbøker for sport og trening
pl: Poradniki sportowe
pt: Manuais de equipamentos esportivos e de recreação
ru: Руководства для тренажеров и оборудования для фитнеса
sv: Handböcker för träningsutrustning
tr: Egzersiz ve Fitness Aleti Kullanım Kılavuzları

en: Household Appliance Manuals
xx: Household Appliance Manuals
cs: Manuály k domácím spotřebičům
da: Manualer til husholdningsapparater
de: Handbücher für Haushaltsgeräte
es: Manuales de electrodomésticos
fr: Guides d'utilisation d'appareils électroménagers
it: Manuali elettrodomestici
ja: 家電製品マニュアル
nl: Handleidingen voor huishoudapparatuur
no: Håndbøker for husholdningsapparater
pl: Instrukcje obsługi AGD
pt: Manuais de eletrodomésticos
ru: Руководства по эксплуатации бытовых электроприборов
sv: Handböcker för hushållsapparater
tr: Elektrikli Ev Eşyası Kullanım Kılavuzları

en: Kitchen Appliance Manuals
xx: Kitchen Appliance Manuals
cs: Manuály ke kuchyňským spotřebičům
da: Manualer til køkkenapparater
de: Handbücher für Küchengeräte
es: Manuales de aparatos de cocina
fr: Guides d'utilisation d'électroménagers de cuisine
it: Manuali strumenti cucina
ja: キッチン家電マニュアル
nl: Handleidingen voor keukenmachines
no: Håndbøker for kjøkkenapparater
pl: Instrukcje obsługi urządzeń kuchennych
pt: Manuais de eletrodomésticos de cozinha
ru: Руководства по эксплуатации кухонного оборудования
sv: Handböcker för köksutrustning
tr: Elektrikli Mutfak Aleti Kullanım Kılavuzları

en: Model & Toys Manuals
xx: Model & Toys Manuals
cs: Návody k modelům a hračkám
da: Manualer til køkkenmaskiner
de: Handbücher für Modellbau und Spielzeuge
es: Manuales de juguetes y modelos
fr: Manuels pour modèles réduits et jouets
it: Manuali di modelli e giocattoli
ja: 模型・おもちゃ用マニュアル
nl: Model- en speelgoedhandleidingen
no: Modell- og leketøyhåndbøker
pl: Instrukcje obsługi modeli i zabawek
pt: Manuais de brinquedos
ru: Руководства к приборам и игрушкам
sv: Handböcker för modellbyggen och leksaker
tr: Model ve Oyuncak Kullanım Kılavuzları

en: Office Supply Manuals
xx: Office Supply Manuals
cs: Návody ke kancelářským potřebám
da: Manualer til kontorforsyning
de: Bürobedarf-Handbücher
es: Manuales de suministros de oficina
fr: Manuels pour fournitures de bureau
it: Manuali di prodotti per ufficio
ja: オフィス用品マニュアル
nl: Handleidingen voor kantoorartikelen
no: Bruksanvisninger for kontorutstyr
pl: Instrukcje obsługi do artykułów biurowych
pt: Manuais de materiais de escritório
ru: Руководства для офисного оборудования
sv: Bruksanvisningar för kontorsmaterial
tr: Ofis Malzemeleri Kullanım Kılavuzları

en: Power Tool & Equipment Manuals
xx: Power Tool & Equipment Manuals
cs: Návody k elektrickému nářadí a vybavení
da: Manualer til elektrisk værktøj og udstyr
de: Handbücher für Elektrowerkzeuge
es: Manuales para equipos y herramientas eléctricos
fr: Guides d'utilisation d'outils et d'équipements électriques
it: Manuali per apparecchi e strumenti elettrici
ja: 電動工具マニュアル
nl: Handleidingen voor elektrisch gereedschap
no: Håndbøker for elektroverktøy og -utstyr
pl: Instrukcje obsługi sprzętu elektrycznego
pt: Manuais de equipamentos e furadeiras elétricas
ru: Руководства для электрических инструментов и оборудования
sv: Handböcker för elverktyg och -utrustning
tr: Elektrikli Aletler ve Ekipman Kılavuzları

en: Vehicle Service Manuals
xx: Vehicle Service Manuals
cs: Provozní příručky k dopravním prostředkům
da: Manualer til køretøjseftersyn
de: Kfz-Handbücher
es: Manuales de mantenimiento de vehículos
fr: Guides d'utilisation de voitures
it: Manuali manutenzione veicoli
ja: 乗り物用サービスマニュアル
nl: Gebruikshandleidingen voor voertuigen
no: Bilservice-håndbøker
pl: Instrukcje naprawy pojazdów
pt: Manuais de serviço de automóveis
ru: Руководства по обслуживанию автомобилей
sv: Handböcker för fordonsservice
tr: Taşıt Kullanım Kılavuzları

en: Sheet Music
xx: Sheet Music
cs: Noty
da: Nodeark
de: Notenblätter
es: Partituras
fr: Partitions
it: Musica su partitura
ja: 楽譜
nl: Bladmuziek
no: Noter
pl: Nuty
pt: Partitura
ru: Ноты
sv: Musiknoter
tr: Nota Kağıtları

en: Arts & Entertainment
xx: Arts & Entertainment
cs: Umění a zábava
da: Kunst og underholdning
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung
es: Arte y ocio
fr: Arts et loisirs
it: Arte e svago
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント
nl: Kunst en entertainment
no: Kunst og underholdning
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka
pt: Artes e entretenimento
ru: Искусство и развлечения
sv: Konst och underhållning
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence

en: Tickets
ar: تذكرة
cs: Vstupenky
da: Billetter
de: Eintrittskarten
eo: Biletoj
ja: 切符
ko: 입장권
sv: Biljetter
th: ตั๋ว
zh: 門票

en: Event Tickets
xx: Event Tickets
da: Billetter til begivenheder
es: Entradas para eventos
fr: Billets d'événements
it: Biglietti per eventi
ja: イベント チケット
nl: Tickets voor evenementen
no: Arrangementsbilletter
pl: Bilety na wydarzenia
pt: Ingressos de eventos
ru: Билеты на мероприятия
sv: Biljetter till evenemang
tr: Etkinlik Biletleri

en: Museum tickets
da: Museumsbilletter
sv: Museibiljetter

en: Hobbies & Creative Arts
xx: Hobbies & Creative Arts
cs: Hobby\, hudba a výtvarné umění
da: Hobby og håndarbejde
de: Hobby & Kunst
es: Hobbies y artes creativas
fr: Loisirs et arts créatifs
it: Hobby e arti creative
ja: 趣味・コレクション
nl: Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden
no: Hobby og kunst
pl: Hobby i sztuki piękne
pt: Hobbies e artes
ru: Хобби и творчество
sv: Hobby och skapande
tr: Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar